Louisiana, session 2026, HB92.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:42(A)(8) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§42. First degree rape
A. First degree rape is a rape committed upon a person sixty-five years of
age or older or where the anal, oral, or vaginal sexual intercourse is deemed to be
without lawful consent of the victim because it is committed under any one or more
of the following circumstances:
* * *
(8) When the victim is prevented from resisting the act because of the
offender's application of force that overpowers the victim's ability to resist.
* * *
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 92 ENROLLED
Section 2. Code of Criminal Procedure Articles 465(A)(introductory paragraph),
573.4, and 814(A)(11) are hereby amended and reenacted and Code of Criminal Procedure
Article 465(A)(47) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 465. Specific indictment forms
A. The following forms of charging offenses may be used, but any other
forms authorized by this title Title may also be used:
* * *
47. Forcible Rape or Second Degree Rape--A.B. committed forcible or
second degree rape upon C.D.
* * *
Art. 573.4. Running of time limitations; exception; third degree rape
The time limitations established by Article 572 shall not commence to run
as to the crime of third degree rape (R.S. 14:43) until the crime is discovered by the
victim. Notwithstanding the provisions of Article 572(A) and except as provided by
Articles 571.1, 572(B), or any other provision of law that establishes a longer period
of limitation, the time within which to institute prosecution of the crime of third
degree rape (R.S. 14:43) shall be ten years. This period shall not commence to run
until the crime is discovered by the victim.
* * *
Art. 814. Responsive verdicts; in particular
A. The only responsive verdicts which may be rendered when the indictment
charges the following offenses are:
* * *
11. First degree rape (formerly titled aggravated rape) except where the
victim is a child under the age of thirteen:
Guilty.
Guilty of attempted first degree rape.
Guilty of second degree rape.
Guilty of attempted second degree rape.
Guilty of sexual battery.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 92 ENROLLED
Guilty of third degree rape.
Guilty of attempted third degree rape.
Guilty of oral sexual battery.
Guilty of sexual battery.
Guilty of attempted sexual battery.
Not guilty.
* * *
Section 3. R.S. 14:43.3 is hereby repealed in its entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.